Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2522
Ballots; preparation; form.

All ballots for use in special elections under the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act shall be prepared by the city clerk and furnished by the governing body, unless the governing body contracts with the county for such service, and shall be in form the same as provided by law for election of the chief executive officer and governing body of such municipality. When ordinances under the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act are submitted to the electors at a regularly scheduled primary or general election, they shall be placed upon the official ballots as provided in the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 22;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 14;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 174.